Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2352.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1203-B(e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1203-B. Program establishment and duties of agency.* * *(e) Grant amount.--* * *(2.1) An eligible student teacher who completes required student teaching in a school entity in a subject shortage area in this Commonwealth shall, in addition to the amount awarded under paragraph (1), receive a minimum grant amount 1234567891011121314151617181920 of $5,000. The agency, in consultation with the department, shall utilize data from the department to determine the subject shortage areas.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2352PN3121 - 2 - 12345